Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.60.280

Local elected officials, commencement of term of office—Purpose.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1573.SL) ***

(1) The legislature finds that certain laws are in conflict governing the assumption of office of various local officials. The purpose of this section is to provide a common date for the assumption of office for all the elected officials of counties, cities, towns, and special purpose districts other than school districts where the ownership of property is not a prerequisite of voting. A person elected to the office of school director begins his or her term of office at the first official meeting of the board of directors after certification of the election results. It is also the purpose of this section to remove these conflicts and delete old statutory language concerning such elections which is no longer necessary.

(2) For elective offices of counties, cities, towns, and special purpose districts other than school districts where the ownership of property is not a prerequisite of voting, the term of incumbents ends and the term of successors begins after the successor is elected and qualified, and the term commences immediately after December 31st following the election, except as follows:

(a) Where the term of office varies from this standard according to statute; and

(b) If the election results have not been certified prior to January 1st after the election, in which event the time of commencement for the new term occurs when the successor becomes qualified in accordance with RCW 29A.04.133.

(3) For elective offices governed by this section, the oath of office must be taken as the last step of qualification as defined in RCW 29A.04.133 but may be taken either:

(a) Up to ten days prior to the scheduled date of assuming office; or

(b) At the last regular meeting of the governing body of the applicable county, city, town, or special district held before the winner is to assume office.

[ 2003 c 111 s 504; 1999 c 298 s 3; 1980 c 35 s 7; 1979 ex.s. c 126 s 1. Formerly RCW 29A.20.040, 29.04.170.]

NOTES:

Severability—1980 c 35: See note following RCW 28A.343.300.